District of Columbia statutes.
16-401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Artificial insemination” means the process by which a man’s fresh or frozen sperm sample is introduced into a woman’s vagina, other than by sexual intercourse, under the supervision of a physician.

(2)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(3)

“In vitro fertilization” means a procedure in which an ovum is surgically removed from a genetic mother’s ovary and fertilized with the sperm of the genetic father in a laboratory procedure, with the resulting embryo implanted in the uterus of a birth mother.

(4)

“Surrogate parenting contract” means any agreement, oral or written, in which:

(A)

A woman agrees either to be artificially inseminated with the sperm of a man who is not her husband, or to be impregnated with an embryo that is the product of an ovum fertilization with the sperm of a man who is not her husband; and

(B)

A woman agrees to, or intends to, relinquish all parental rights and responsibilities and to consent to the adoption of a child born as a result of insemination or in vitro fertilization as provided in this chapter.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-219, § 2, 40 DCR 582
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 18(a), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 16-401.